New York, session 2025-2026, S4061.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 201-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 201-b. Parking facilities; solar canopies. 1. a. Any parking garage, 4 open parking lot or other parking facility owned and/or operated by the 5 state of New York, that offers parking spaces for the purposes of public 6 use, state employee use or pay-per-usage constructed prior to January 7 first, two thousand thirty, is hereby permitted and encouraged to 8 install solar canopies in such facilities. 9 b. After January first, two thousand thirty, any construction project 10 undertaken in this state by the state where the scope of such project 11 includes a parking garage, open parking lot or other parking facility 12 that offers parking spaces for the purposes of public use, state employ- 13 ee use or pay-per-usage or includes a parking garage, open parking lot 14 or other parking facility constructed by a private entity using state 15 capital funding shall install solar canopies in such facilities. 16 2. For the purposes of this section, "solar canopy" shall mean a 17 system designed to capture solar radiation for the purpose of producing 18 usable energy. 19 3. The office of general services shall be responsible for the instal- 20 lation of any solar canopies or associated equipment; provided, however, 21 if such parking facility is privately owned, such private owner shall be 22 responsible for such installation. If the office of general services is 23 unable to install such equipment, the state may contract with a licensed 24 electrician or similar service provider. Such contracted work shall 25 comply with the provisions of article eight of the labor law, including EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06243-01-5 S. 4061 2 1 the payment of a wage of not less than the prevailing wage in the local- 2 ity where such solar canopy is located. 3 4. The office of general services shall be responsible for the mainte- 4 nance, general upkeep, and repair of any solar canopy or associated 5 equipment installed by such office. If the office of general services is 6 unable to complete such maintenance or repairs, the state may contract 7 with a licensed electrician or similar repair service to complete the 8 necessary work on said equipment. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.